Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 55.1-1204.
Terms and conditions of rental agreement; payment of rent; copy of rental agreement for tenant.

A landlord and tenant may include in a rental agreement terms and conditions not prohibited by this chapter or other rule of law, including rent, charges for late payment of rent, the term of the agreement, automatic renewal of the rental agreement, requirements for notice of intent to vacate or terminate the rental agreement, and other provisions governing the rights and obligations of the parties.

A landlord shall offer a prospective tenant a written rental agreement containing the terms governing the rental of the dwelling unit and setting forth the terms and conditions of the landlord-tenant relationship and shall provide with it the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities developed by the Department of Housing and Community Development and posted on its website pursuant to §

36-139

. The parties to a written rental agreement shall sign the form developed by the Department of Housing and Community Development and posted on its website pursuant to §

36-139

acknowledging that the tenant has received from the landlord the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities. The written rental agreement shall be effective upon the date signed by the parties.

If a landlord does not offer a written rental agreement, the tenancy shall exist by operation of law, consisting of the following terms and conditions:

The provision of this chapter shall be applicable to the dwelling unit that is being rented;

The duration of the rental agreement shall be for 12 months and shall not be subject to automatic renewal, except in the event of a month-to-month lease as otherwise provided for under subsection C of §

55.1-1253

;

Rent shall be paid in 12 equal periodic installments in an amount agreed upon by the landlord and the tenant and if no amount is agreed upon, the installments shall be at fair market rent;

Rent payments shall be due on the first day of each month during the tenancy and shall be considered late if not paid by the fifth of the month;

If the rent is paid by the tenant after the fifth day of any given month, the landlord shall be entitled to charge a late charge as provided in this chapter;

The landlord may collect a security deposit in an amount that does not exceed a total amount equal to two months of rent; and

The parties may enter into a written rental agreement at any time during the 12-month tenancy created by this subsection.

Except as provided in the written rental agreement, or as provided in subsection C if no written agreement is offered, rent shall be payable without demand or notice at the time and place agreed upon by the parties. Except as provided in the written rental agreement, rent is payable at the place designated by the landlord, and periodic rent is payable at the beginning of any term of one month or less and otherwise in equal installments at the beginning of each month. If the landlord receives from a tenant a written request for a written statement of charges and payments, he shall provide the tenant with a written statement showing all debits and credits over the tenancy or the past 12 months, whichever is shorter. The landlord shall provide such written statement within 10 business days of receiving the request.

A landlord shall not charge a tenant for late payment of rent unless such charge is provided for in the written rental agreement. No such late charge shall exceed the lesser of 10 percent of the periodic rent or 10 percent of the remaining balance due and owed by the tenant.

Except as provided in the written rental agreement or, as provided in subsection C if no written agreement is offered, the tenancy shall be week-to-week in the case of a tenant who pays weekly rent and month-to-month in all other cases. Terminations of tenancies shall be governed by §

55.1-1253

unless the rental agreement provides for a different notice period.

If the rental agreement contains any provision allowing the landlord to approve or disapprove a sublessee or assignee of the tenant, the landlord shall, within 10 business days of receipt of the written application of the prospective sublessee or assignee on a form to be provided by the landlord, approve or disapprove the sublessee or assignee. Failure of the landlord to act within 10 business days is evidence of his approval.

The landlord shall provide a copy of any written rental agreement and the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities to the tenant within one month of the effective date of the written rental agreement. The failure of the landlord to deliver such a rental agreement and statement shall not affect the validity of the agreement. However, the landlord shall not file or maintain an action against the tenant in a court of law for any alleged lease violation until he has provided the tenant with the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities.

No unilateral change in the terms of a rental agreement by a landlord or tenant shall be valid unless (i) notice of the change is given in accordance with the terms of the rental agreement or as otherwise required by law and (ii) both parties consent in writing to the change.

The landlord shall provide the tenant with a written receipt, upon request from the tenant, whenever the tenant pays rent in the form of cash or money order.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.7; 1977, c. 427; 1983, c. 39; 1988, c. 68; 2000, c. 760; 2003, c. 424; 2012, cc. 464, 503; 2013, c. 563; 2017, c. 730; 2019, cc. 5, 45, 712; 2020, cc. 985, 986, 998, 1231; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 427.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 5 and 45 amended § 55-248.7, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by rewriting subsection B; adding subsection C; in subsection D, inserting the exception in the first sentence and substituting “Except as provided in the written rental agreement” for “Unless otherwise agreed” in the second sentence; and in subsection E, substituted “Except as provided in the written rental agreement or, as provided in subsection C if no written agreement is offered” for “Unless the rental agreement fixes a definite term”; and made stylistic changes.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “subsection C of §

55.1-1253

” for “subsection C of § 55-248.37.”

Acts 2020, cc. 985 and 986, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Housing and Community Development shall convene a stakeholder group consisting of landlords, property managers, and tenants, as well as attorneys knowledgeable in the Virginia Residential Landlord and Tenant Act (§

55.1-1200

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and other applicable provisions of the Code of Virginia relating to eviction procedures in residential landlord-tenant cases for the purpose of providing input into (i) the development of the form to be developed by the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development for posting on its website pursuant to §

36-139

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, acknowledging that a tenant has received from the landlord the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities and (ii) any updates to the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 985 and 986 are identical, and in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “prospective” and added “and shall provide with it the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities developed by the Department of Housing and Community Development and posted on its website pursuant to §

36-139

” and inserted the second sentence; in subsection G (now subsection H), in the first sentence, substituted “and the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities” for “signed by both the tenant and the landlord,” inserted “and statement” in the second sentence and added the third sentence; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 998 substituted “security deposit in an amount, or require damage insurance coverage for an amount, or any combination thereof, not to exceed a total amount” for “security deposit not to exceed an amount” in subdivision C 6.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1231, effective April 22, 2020, inserted subsection E, and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 427, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “that does not exceed” for “or require damage insurance coverage for an amount, or any combination thereof not to exceed” and made a stylistic change.

§ 55.1-1205.
Prepaid rent; maintenance of escrow account.

A landlord and a tenant may agree in a rental agreement that the tenant pay prepaid rent. If a landlord receives prepaid rent, it shall be placed in an escrow account in a federally insured depository authorized to do business in Virginia by the end of the fifth business day following receipt and shall remain in the account until such time as the prepaid rent becomes due. Unless the landlord has otherwise become entitled to receive any portion of the prepaid rent, it shall not be removed from the escrow account required by this section without the written consent of the tenant.

History.

2002, c. 531, § 55-248.7:1; 2015, c. 596; 2017, c. 730; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1206.
Landlord may obtain certain insurance for tenant.

A landlord may require as a condition of tenancy that a tenant have damage insurance and pay for the cost of premiums. As provided in §

55.1-1200

, such payments shall not be deemed a security deposit, but shall be rent. However, as provided in §

55.1-1208

, the landlord shall not require a tenant to pay both a security deposit and the cost of damage insurance premiums if the total amount of any security deposit and damage insurance premiums exceeds the amount of two months’ periodic rent. The landlord shall notify a tenant in writing that the tenant has the right to obtain a separate policy from the landlord’s policy for damage insurance. If a tenant elects to obtain a separate policy, the tenant shall submit to the landlord written proof of such coverage and shall maintain such coverage at all times during the term of the rental agreement. Where a landlord obtains damage insurance coverage on behalf of a tenant, the insurance policy shall provide coverage for the tenant as an insured. The landlord shall recover from the tenant the actual costs of such insurance coverage and may recover administrative or other fees associated with administration of a damage insurance policy, including a tenant opting out of the insurance coverage provided by the landlord pursuant to this subsection. If a landlord obtains damage insurance for his tenants, the landlord shall provide to each tenant, prior to execution of the rental agreement, a summary of the insurance policy or certificate evidencing the coverage being provided and upon request of the tenant make available a copy of the insurance policy. For a tenant that opts out of the landlord’s damage insurance program, the landlord shall allow such tenant to either provide their own damage insurance policy or pay the full security deposit.

A landlord may require as a condition of tenancy that a tenant have renter’s insurance as specified in the rental agreement. A landlord may require a tenant to pay for the cost of premiums for such renter’s insurance obtained by the landlord, in order to provide such coverage for the tenant as part of rent or as otherwise provided in this section. As provided in §

55.1-1200

, such payments shall not be deemed a security deposit but shall be rent. The landlord shall notify a tenant in writing that the tenant has the right to obtain a separate policy from the landlord’s policy for renter’s insurance. If a tenant elects to obtain a separate policy, the tenant shall submit to the landlord written proof of such coverage and shall maintain such coverage at all times during the term of the rental agreement. If a tenant allows his renter’s insurance policy required by the rental agreement to lapse for any reason, the landlord may provide any landlord’s renter’s insurance coverage to such tenant. The tenant shall be obligated to pay for the cost of premiums for such insurance as rent or as otherwise provided herein until the tenant has provided written documentation to the landlord showing that the tenant has reinstated his own renter’s insurance coverage.

If the landlord requires that such premiums be paid to the landlord prior to the commencement of the tenancy, the total amount of all security deposits, insurance premiums for damage insurance, and insurance premiums for renter’s insurance shall not exceed the amount of two months’ periodic rent. However, the landlord shall be permitted to add a monthly amount as additional rent to recover additional costs of renter’s insurance premiums.

Where a landlord obtains renter’s insurance coverage on behalf of a tenant, the insurance policy shall provide coverage for the tenant as an insured. The landlord shall recover from the tenant the actual costs of such insurance coverage and may recover administrative or other fees associated with the administration of a renter’s insurance program, including a tenant opting out of the insurance coverage provided to the tenant pursuant to this subsection. If a landlord obtains renter’s insurance for his tenants, the landlord shall provide to each tenant, prior to execution of the rental agreement, a summary of the insurance policy prepared by the insurer or certificate evidencing the coverage being provided and upon request of the tenant make available a copy of the insurance policy. Such summary or certificate shall include a statement regarding whether the insurance policy contains a waiver of subrogation provision. Any failure of the landlord to provide such summary or certificate, or to make available a copy of the insurance policy, shall not affect the validity of the rental agreement.If the rental agreement does not require the tenant to obtain renter’s insurance, the landlord shall provide a written notice to the tenant, prior to the execution of the rental agreement, stating that (i) the landlord is not responsible for the tenant’s personal property, (ii) the landlord’s insurance coverage does not cover the tenant’s personal property, and (iii) if the tenant wishes to protect his personal property, he should obtain renter’s insurance. The notice shall inform the tenant that any such renter’s insurance obtained by the tenant does not cover flood damage and advise the tenant to contact the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) or visit the websites for FEMA’s National Flood Insurance Program or for the Virginia Department of Conservation and Recreation’s Flood Risk Information System to obtain information regarding whether the property is located in a special flood hazard area. Any failure of the landlord to provide such notice shall not affect the validity of the rental agreement. If the tenant requests translation of the notice from the English language to another language, the landlord may assist the tenant in obtaining a translator or refer the tenant to an electronic translation service. In doing so, the landlord shall not be deemed to have breached any of his obligations under this chapter or otherwise become liable for any inaccuracies in the translation. The landlord shall not charge a fee for such assistance or referral.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the landlord from recovering from the tenant, as part of the rent, the tenant’s prorated share of the actual costs of other insurance coverages provided by the landlord relative to the premises, or the tenant’s prorated share of a self-insurance program held in an escrow account by the landlord, including the landlord’s administrative or other fees associated with the administration of such coverages. The landlord may apply such funds held in escrow to pay claims pursuant to the landlord’s self-insurance plan.

History.

2004, c. 123, § 55-248.7:2; 2005, c. 285; 2010, c. 550; 2012, c. 788; 2015, c. 596; 2018, c. 221; 2019, cc. 386, 394, 712; 2020, c. 998; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 427.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 386 amended § 55-248.7:2 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in subsection D of this section by adding the last sentence in the first paragraph and adding the second paragraph.

Acts 2019, c. 394 amended § 55-248.7:2 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect by adding the last two sentences in subsection D.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 998, in subsection A, substituted “insurance coverage exceeds” for “insurance premiums exceeds” in the third sentence; and in subsection C, substituted “deposits, insurance coverage for damage insurance, and insurance premiums for renter’s” for “deposits and insurance premiums for damage insurance and renter’s” in the first sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 427, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, rewrote the first sentence, which formerly read: “A landlord may require as a condition of tenancy that a tenant have commercial insurance coverage as specified in the rental agreement to secure the performance by the tenant of the terms and conditions of the rental agreement and pay for the cost of premiums for such insurance coverage obtained by the landlord, generally known as ‘damage insurance,’ ” and added the last sentence; in subsection B, deleted “that is a combination multi-peril policy containing fire, miscellaneous property, and personal liability coverage insuring personal property located in dwelling units not occupied by the owner” from the end of the first sentence, and inserted “renter’s” in the second sentence; rewrote subsection C, which formerly read: “If the landlord requires that such premiums be paid prior to the commencement of the tenancy, the total amount of all security deposits, insurance coverage for damage insurance, and insurance premiums for renter’s insurance shall not exceed the amount of two months’ periodic rent. Otherwise, the landlord may add a monthly amount as additional rent to recover the costs of such insurance coverage.”

§ 55.1-1207.
Effect of unsigned or undelivered rental agreement.

If the landlord does not sign and deliver a written rental agreement signed and delivered to him by the tenant, acceptance of rent without reservation by the landlord gives the rental agreement the same effect as if it had been signed and delivered by the landlord. If the tenant does not sign and deliver a written rental agreement signed and delivered to him by the landlord, acceptance of possession or payment of rent without reservation gives the rental agreement the same effect as if it had been signed and delivered by the tenant. If a rental agreement given effect pursuant to this section provides for a term longer than one year, it is effective for only one year.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.8; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1208.
Prohibited provisions in rental agreements.

A rental agreement shall not contain provisions that the tenant:

Agrees to waive or forgo rights or remedies under this chapter;

Agrees to waive or forgo rights or remedies pertaining to the 120-day conversion or rehabilitation notice required in the Virginia Condominium Act (§

55.1-1900

et seq.) or the Virginia Real Estate Cooperative Act (§

55.1-2100

et seq.) or under §

55.1-1410

;

Authorizes any person to confess judgment on a claim arising out of the rental agreement;

Agrees to pay the landlord’s attorney fees except as provided in this chapter;

Agrees to the exculpation or limitation of any liability of the landlord to the tenant arising under law or to indemnify the landlord for that liability or any associated costs;

Agrees as a condition of tenancy in public housing to a prohibition or restriction of any lawful possession of a firearm within individual dwelling units unless required by federal law or regulation;

Agrees to the payment of a security deposit, insurance premiums for damage insurance, and insurance premiums for renter’s insurance prior to the commencement of the tenancy that exceed the amount of two months’ periodic rent; or

Agrees to waive remedies or rights under the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq., prior to the occurrence of a dispute between landlord and tenant. Execution of leases shall not be contingent upon the execution of a waiver of rights under the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act; however, upon the occurrence of any dispute, the landlord and tenant may execute a waiver of such rights and remedies as to that dispute in order to facilitate a resolution.

Any provision prohibited by subsection A that is included in a rental agreement is unenforceable. If a landlord brings an action to enforce any such provision, the tenant may recover actual damages sustained by him and reasonable attorney fees.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.9; 1977, c. 427; 1987, c. 473; 1991, c. 720; 2000, c. 760; 2002, c. 531; 2003, c. 905; 2016, c. 744; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 998; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 427, 477, 478.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 998 substituted “coverage” for “premium” in subdivision A 7.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 427, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subdivision A 7, which formerly read: “Agrees to both the payment of a security deposit and the provision of a bond or commercial insurance policy purchased by the tenant to secure the performance of the terms and conditions of a rental agreement, if the total of the security deposit and the bond or insurance coverage exceeds the amount of two months’ periodic rent.”

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477 and 478, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added subdivision A 8, and made stylistic changes.

§ 55.1-1208.1.
Rental agreements; child care.

A rental agreement may contain provisions that allow the operation of child care services provided by a tenant of an apartment building that meet state and local laws and regulations.

History.

2022, c. 267.

§ 55.1-1209.
Confidentiality of tenant records.

No landlord or managing agent shall release information about a tenant or prospective tenant in the possession of the landlord or managing agent to a third party unless:

The tenant or prospective tenant has given prior written consent;

The information is a matter of public record as defined in §

2.2-3701

;

The information is a summary of the tenant’s rent payment record, including the amount of the tenant’s periodic rent payment;

The information is a copy of a material noncompliance notice that has not been remedied or a termination notice given to the tenant under §

55.1-1245

and the tenant did not remain in the premises after such notice was given;

The information is requested by a local, state, or federal law-enforcement or public safety official in the performance of his duties;

The information is requested pursuant to a subpoena in a civil case;

The information is requested by a local commissioner of the revenue in accordance with §

58.1-3901

;

The information is requested by a contract purchaser of the landlord’s property, provided that the contract purchaser agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality of such information;

The information is requested by a lender of the landlord for financing or refinancing of the property;

The information is requested by the commanding officer, military housing officer, or military attorney of the tenant;

The third party is the landlord’s attorney or the landlord’s collection agency;

The information is otherwise provided in the case of an emergency;

The information is requested by the landlord to be provided to the managing agent or a successor to the managing agent; or

The information is requested by an employee or independent contractor of the United States to obtain census information pursuant to federal law.

Any information received by a landlord pursuant to §

55.1-1203

shall remain a confidential tenant record and shall not be released to any person except in response to a subpoena.

A tenant may designate a third party to receive duplicate copies of a summons that has been issued pursuant to §

8.01-126

and of written notices from the landlord relating to the tenancy. Where such a third party has been designated by the tenant, the landlord shall mail the duplicate copy of any summons issued pursuant to §

8.01-126

or notice to the designated third party at the same time the summons or notice is mailed to or served upon the tenant. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to grant standing to any third party designated by the tenant to challenge actions of the landlord in which notice was mailed pursuant to this subsection. The failure of the landlord to give notice to a third party designated by the tenant shall not affect the validity of any judgment entered against the tenant.

A landlord or managing agent may enter into an agreement with a third-party service provider to maintain tenant records in electronic form or other medium. In such case, the landlord and managing agent shall not be liable under this section in the event of a breach of the electronic data of such third-party service provider, except in the case of gross negligence or intentional act. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a landlord or managing agent to indemnify such third-party service provider.

A tenant may request a copy of his tenant records in paper or electronic form. If the rental agreement so provides, a landlord may charge a tenant requesting more than one copy of his records the actual costs of preparing copies of such records. However, if the landlord makes available tenant records to each tenant by electronic portal, the tenant shall not be required to pay for access to such portal.

History.

1985, c. 567, § 55-248.9:1; 2000, c. 760; 2003, c. 426; 2006, cc. 491, 667; 2008, c. 489; 2010, c. 550; 2015, c. 596; 2016, c. 744; 2018, c. 221; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 388.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 388 inserted subsection B and redesignated subsections accordingly.

§ 55.1-1210.
Landlord and tenant remedies for abuse of access.

If the tenant refuses to allow lawful access, the landlord may obtain injunctive relief to compel access, or terminate the rental agreement. In either case, the landlord may recover actual damages and reasonable attorney fees. If the landlord makes an unlawful entry or a lawful entry in an unreasonable manner or makes repeated demands for entry that is otherwise lawful but that have the effect of unreasonably harassing the tenant, the tenant may obtain injunctive relief to prevent the recurrence of the conduct, or terminate the rental agreement. In either case, the tenant may recover actual damages and reasonable attorney fees.

History.

2000, c. 760, § 55-248.10:1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1211.
Appointment of resident agent by nonresident property owner; service of process, etc., on such agent or on Secretary of the Commonwealth.

As used in this section, “nonresident property owner” means any nonresident individual or group of individuals who owns and leases residential real property.

Every nonresident property owner shall appoint and continuously maintain an agent who (i) if such agent is an individual, is a resident of the Commonwealth, or if such agent is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other entity, is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and (ii) maintains a business office within the Commonwealth. Every lease executed by or on behalf of nonresident property owners regarding any such real property shall specifically designate such agent and the agent’s office address for the purpose of service of any process, notice, order, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon such nonresident property owner.

Whenever any nonresident property owner fails to appoint or maintain an agent, as required in this section, or whenever his agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found, then the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall be an agent of the nonresident property owner upon whom may be served any process, notice, order, or demand. Service may be made on the Secretary of the Commonwealth or any of his staff at his office who shall forthwith cause it to be sent by registered or certified mail addressed to the nonresident property owner at his address as shown on the official tax records maintained by the locality where the property is located.

The name and office address of the agent appointed as provided in this section shall be listed on a form provided by the State Corporation Commission and delivered to the office of the clerk of the State Corporation Commission for filing. Beginning July 1, 2022, the clerk of the State Corporation Commission shall charge a fee of $10 for the filing of a resident agent appointment.

No nonresident property owner shall maintain an action in the courts of the Commonwealth concerning property for which a designation is required by this section until such designation has been filed.

History.

1973, c. 301, § 55-218.1; 1987, c. 360; 2006, c. 318; 2008, c. 119; 2019, cc. 365, 712; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 427.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2019, c. 365 amended
§ 55-218.1 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in this section by adding subsection A; substituting “B. Every nonresident property owner shall appoint” for “Any nonresident person of the Commonwealth who owns and leases residential real property consisting of four or more units within the Commonwealth shall have” and “(i) if such agent is an individual, is a resident of the Commonwealth, or if such agent is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other entity, is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and (ii)” for “is a resident and” in the first sentence; and inserting subsection designations C, D, and E.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 427, cl. 2 provides:

“That the clerk of the State Corporation Commission (the clerk) shall provide a downloadable form for the filing of a resident agent appointment pursuant to
§

55.1-1211

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and begin accepting paper filings on July 1, 2021. The clerk shall begin accepting online filings pursuant to
§

55.1-1211

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, by July 1, 2022.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 427, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subsection D, which formerly read: “The name and office address of the agent appointed as provided in this section shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the court in which deeds are recorded in the county or city in which the property lies. Recordation shall be in the same book as certificates of fictitious names are recorded as provided by § 59.1-74, for which the clerk shall be entitled to a fee of $10.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The cases cited below were decided under prior law.

Stay of action until landlord recorded agent. —

Where a Maryland resident landlord maintained a registered agent in Virginia but failed to record the agent’s name and address in the book of fictitious names as required, the court stayed the action until the landlord complied with the law. 6601 Little River Tpk., L.L.C. v. Caballero Architects, AIA, PC, 61 Va. Cir. 53, 2003 Va. Cir. LEXIS 13 (Fairfax County Jan. 16, 2003).

Amendment to pleadings. —

Where no ruling on the merits of a lease dispute had been made and no final order had been entered, the parties were still “at trial”; therefore, company could conform the pleadings to the evidence regarding its corporate registration and state of existence under
§ 55-218.1..
6601 Little River Tpk. LLC v. Caballero Architects, AIA, PC, 61 Va. Cir. 53, 2003 Va. Cir. LEXIS 60 (Fairfax County Feb. 11, 2003).